Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 40. Special Elections and Appointments.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to certain sections in this chapter, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended certain sections in this chapter, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”